Utah statutes.
41-6a-306.   Pedestrian traffic-control signals -- Rights and duties.
(1)  A pedestrian facing a steady "Walk" or symbol of "Walking Person" of a
pedestrian traffic-control signal has the right-of-way and may proceed across
the roadway in the direction of the signal.
(2)  A pedestrian facing a flashing "Don't Walk" or "Upraised Hand" of a
pedestrian traffic-control signal may not start to cross the roadway in the
direction of the signal, but a pedestrian who has partially completed crossing
on the walk signal shall proceed to a sidewalk or safety island.
(3)  A pedestrian facing a steady "Don't Walk" or "Upraised Hand" of a
pedestrian traffic-control signal may not enter the roadway in the direction
of the signal.
